Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2270
Individual less than nineteen years of age; conditions of probation.

Any individual who is less than nineteen years of age and who is subject to the supervision of a juvenile probation officer or an adult probation officer pursuant to an order of the district court, county court, or juvenile court shall, as a condition of probation, be required to:

(1) Attend school to obtain vocational training or to achieve an appropriate educational level as prescribed by the probation officer after consultation with the school the individual attends or pursuant to section 29-2272. If the individual fails to attend school regularly, maintain appropriate school behavior, or make satisfactory progress as determined by the probation officer after consultation with the school and the individual does not meet the requirements of subdivision (2) of this section, the district court, county court, or juvenile court shall take appropriate action to enforce, modify, or revoke its order granting probation; or

(2) Attend an on-the-job training program or secure and maintain employment. If the individual fails to attend the program or maintain employment and does not meet the requirements of subdivision (1) of this section, the district court, county court, or juvenile court shall take appropriate action to enforce, modify, or revoke its order granting probation.

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 1.

This section does not authorize the detention of a juvenile placed on probation by a juvenile court. In re Interest of Dakota M., 279 Neb. 802, 781 N.W.2d 612 (2010).